Wyoming, session 2026, SF0116.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-7-101(a)(iii)(B) is amended to
read:

15-7-101. Purposes.

(a) In addition to all other powers provided by law,
any city or town may make public improvements as follows
SF0116

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0289
for which bonds may be issued to the contractor or be sold
as provided in this chapter to:

(iii) Take any action necessary to establish,
purchase, extend, maintain and regulate a water system for
supplying water to and diverting surface water runoff from
its inhabitants and their property and for any other public
purposes, including:

(B) Prescribing and regulating of rates
for:

(I) The use of water; and

(II) The diversion or management of
surface water runoff in compliance with the Surface Water
Drainage Utility Act and after an election as required by
W.S. 16-10-105; and

Section 2.

(a) Any municipality that adopted any ordinance or
resolution for the collection of fees, costs or taxes for
SF0116

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0289
the diversion or management of surface water prior to July
1, 2026 and that did not hold an election pursuant to W.S.
16-10-105 for the approval of the means of financing the
surface water diversion or management system shall:

(i) Hold an election as required by W.S.
16-10-105 not later than July 1, 2027;

(ii) If the electors do not adopt the
proposition submitted under paragraph (i) of this
subsection, the municipality shall cease the collection of
any fees, costs or taxes for financing the surface water
diversion or management system not later than sixty (60)
days following the results of the election.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0116